Utah statutes.
23-28-202.   Removing property from a migratory bird production area.
(1)  A landowner may file a revision notice with the county recorder of the
county in which the migratory bird production area is located to remove land
from a migratory bird production area.
(2)  The revision notice shall contain:
(a)  a legal description of the land removed from the migratory bird
production area;
(b)  the name of the owner or owners of the land removed from the migratory
bird production area.
(3)  A person who files a revision notice under this section shall give a copy
of the revision notice within 10 days of its filing to the legislative body of
the county in which the migratory bird production area is located.
(4)  If removing land from a migratory bird production area results in a
migratory bird production area of less than 300 contiguous acres:
(a)  the migratory bird production area ceases to exist; and
(b)  the landowner shall:
(i)  notify each landowner within the former migratory bird production area;
and
(ii)  file the revision notice required by this section for the entire
migratory bird production area.
